Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1234
Bridge commission; members; employees; removal.

The city council of a city of the metropolitan class, after reasonable notice and hearing, may at any time remove any member of a bridge commission or discharge any employee of such bridge commission for good cause shown, but not arbitrarily nor for political reasons.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 15, p. 625;

C.S.1929, § 14-1215;

R.S.1943, § 14-1234;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 267.
July 21, 2022